Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF630.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2823YH (3) 91 th/ns H.F. 630 Section 1. Section 321.189, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. Appearing on the driverâs license shall be a 3 distinguishing number assigned to the licensee; the licenseeâs 4 full name, date of birth, sex, and residence address; a color 5 photograph of the licensee, who shall not be required to 6 remove eyeglasses ordinarily worn by the licensee ; a physical 7 description of the licensee; the name of the state; the dates 8 of issuance and expiration; and the usual signature of the 9 licensee. The license shall identify the class of vehicle 10 the licensee may operate and the applicable endorsements and 11 restrictions which the department shall require by rule. 12 Sec. 2. Section 321.190, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 13 2025, is amended to read as follows: 14 a. The department shall, upon application and payment 15 of the required fee, issue to an applicant a nonoperatorâs 16 identification card. To be valid the card shall bear a 17 distinguishing number other than a social security number 18 assigned to the cardholder, the full name, date of birth, 19 sex, residence address, a physical description and of the 20 cardholder, a color photograph of the cardholder who shall 21 not be required to remove eyeglasses ordinarily worn by the 22 cardholder , the usual signature of the cardholder, and such 23 other information as the department may require by rule. 24 An applicant for a nonoperatorâs identification card shall 25 apply for the card in the manner provided in section 321.182, 26 subsections 1 through 3 . The card shall be issued to the 27 applicant at the time of application pursuant to procedures 28 established by rule. An applicant for a nonoperatorâs 29 identification card who is required by 50 U.S.C. app. Â§451 30 et seq. to register with the United States selective service 31 system shall be registered by the department with the selective 32 service system as provided in section 321.183 . 33